Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-556
Taxes; levy; delinquent; sale.

If the taxes, assessments, or taxes and assessments, levied are not paid when due as herein provided, then the real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of the taxes and assessments, interest, and penalties, in the manner provided by the statutes of the State of Nebraska for selling property for payment of general taxes. If there are no bids at the tax sale for the property so offered under Class A and Class B, the property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the district in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, village, and city taxes. If there are no bids for the property so offered under Class C and Class D, the property shall be struck off to the district and the tax certificate shall be issued in the name of the district and the board shall have the same power with reference to sale of the tax certificate, as now is vested in a county board and a county treasurer when property is struck off to the counties.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 22, p. 549;

Laws 1951, c. 151, § 11, p. 611.